Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB1354.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Mayor William L. Heydt Memorial Bridge.(a) Findings.--The General Assembly finds and declares as follows:(1) William L. Heydt was born June 11, 1938.(2) A graduate of Central Catholic High School, he enlisted in the United States Marine Corps on June 14, 1956. Mr. Heydt attended aviation school in Jacksonville, Florida, in 1957, where he studied to become a 6431 aviation electrician.(3) Upon completion of his training, Mr. Heydt was assigned to the HMX-1 crew at Marine Corps Air Station in Quantico, Virginia. As part of that unit, he was responsible for the maintenance of the presidential aircraft used to transport President Dwight D. Eisenhower.12345678910111213141516171819 (4) Mr. Heydt was released from active duty on April 12, 1958, with an honorable discharge.(5) Mr. Heydt was elected in 1994 as the 39th Mayor of the City of Allentown, where he dedicated his efforts to Allentown's economic development and downtown revitalization.(6) Mr. Heydt took a lead role in the establishment of the Lights in the Parkway and in the redevelopment of the Hess Brothers Building.(7) Mr. Heydt supported and contributed to numerous organizations, including the Lehigh County Drug and Alcohol Commission, Lehigh County Chamber of Commerce, Allentown Planning Commission, Allentown Economic Development Corporation, Allentown Art Museum, Allentown Miller Symphony Hall, Allentown Jaycees, Lehigh Valley Economic Development Corporation, Police Athletic League, Municipal Opera Company, Pennsylvania League of Cities and the South Whitehall Township Authority.(8) Mr. Heydt sought historic preservation of what is now Hamilton Street in Allentown.(9) Mr. Heydt served as Mayor of Allentown through 2002. After leaving office, he continued supporting the Lehigh Valley through philanthropic efforts by establishing the Heydt Family Fund.(10) Mr. Heydt passed away on April 27, 2025, at 86 years of age.(b) Designation.--The bridge, identified as Bridge Key 53911 carrying U.S. Route 222 over Cedar Creek in Allentown, Lehigh County, is designated as the Mayor William L. Heydt Memorial Bridge.(c) Signs.--The Department of Transportation shall erect and 20260SB1354PN1751 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 maintain appropriate signs displaying the name of the bridge to traffic in both directions on the bridge.Section 2. Effective date.This act shall take effect in 60 days.20260SB1354PN1751 - 3 - 1234